Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Short Title and Reservation of Power

Editor's note. —

2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, made numerous amendments to the Wyoming Business Corporation Act.
Section § 4 of chapter 115 directed the Legislative Service Office to renumber the provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporation Act to correspond as nearly as possible to the numbering of the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with the following:

The renumbering shall conform with the provisions of W.S.

8-1-105

;

Provisions of the Wyoming Business Corporations Act shall be renumbered regardless of whether the provisions are contained within [2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115];

Internal citations within the Wyoming Business Corporations Act and within other provisions of Wyoming statutes shall be conformed;

No action taken pursuant to this section shall alter the meaning;

Where it is not feasible to follow the numbering of the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, for sections and subsections, reference to the Model Act numbers shall be provided either in the section headings or in annotations following the section or subsection as appropriate.

The Wyoming Business Corporation Act has been renumbered as directed by the Legislative Service Office pursuant to the above. The two Acts do not align completely as the numbering system of the Model Act is different from Wyoming Statutes under W.S.

8-1-105

, which is required by the 2009 law to be followed in the renumbering process.

§ 17-16-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Business Corporation Act.”

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” as used in this section, see § 17-16-140(a)(xlvi).

Former Wyoming Business Corporation Act was based on

True v. Hi-Plains Elevator Mach., Inc., 577 P.2d 991,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Porter Muirhead Cornia & Howard v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of CPAs, 844 P.2d 479,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Personal Liability for Directors of Nonprofit Corporations in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1983).

§ 17-16-102.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal; applicability.

The legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of this act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this act are governed by the amendment or repeal.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional control over corporations, see art. 1, § 30, and art. 10, §§ 1 through 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Fundamental change cannot be made over stockholder's dissent. —

Legislative power to change corporation laws does not permit change in charter or articles of incorporation over stockholder's dissent if change is fundamental or unreasonable, but if not, then law authorizing it and stockholders' or officers' action pursuant thereto does not violate dissenter's constitutional rights. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

But corporate life may be extended. —

Extension of corporate life does not impair obligation of contract, since such extension is not a fundamental or unreasonable change in the charter, but is a change which is permitted under the reserved power of alteration or amendment. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).